Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-115
Actions by or against division; intervention.

The division may participate as party plaintiff or defendant, or as intervenor on behalf of this state, or any municipality or citizen thereof, in any controversy having to do with any claimed encroachment by the federal government or any foreign state upon any state or individual rights pertaining to aeronautics.

Laws 1945, c. 5, § 6(9), p. 85;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 14.